Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB595.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2104 of Title 5 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2104. Physician or certified registered nurse practitioner to be in attendance.Before any professional wrestling contest or exhibition shall take place, the promoter and the operator of the arena or facility shall employ a physician or certified registered nurse practitioner to be present at every wrestling contest or exhibition. The physician or certified registered nurse practitioner shall observe the physical condition of the participants throughout the contest or exhibition and shall be authorized to terminate the contest or exhibition when, in his judgment, severe injury would result if the contest or 123456789101112131415161718 exhibition were to continue. A certified registered nurse practitioner employed by the promoter shall practice in accordance with sections 8.2, 8.3 and 8.7 of the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law. The [physician's] fee for the physician or certified registered nurse practitioner shall be paid by the promoter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0595PN0653 - 2 - 1234567